test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-h30_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  Noun - : # h_
    summar+N+Neu+Sg+Nom+Indef: summar
    summar+N+Neu+Sg+Acc+Indef: summar
    summar+N+Neu+Sg+Dat+Indef: sumri
    summar+N+Neu+Sg+Gen+Indef: summars
    summar+N+Neu+Pl+Nom+Indef: [summur, summør]
    summar+N+Neu+Pl+Acc+Indef: [summur, summør]
    summar+N+Neu+Pl+Dat+Indef: sumrum
    summar+N+Neu+Pl+Gen+Indef: sumra
    summar+N+Neu+Sg+Nom+Def: summarið
    summar+N+Neu+Sg+Acc+Def: summarið
    summar+N+Neu+Sg+Dat+Def: [summarinum, sumrinum]
    summar+N+Neu+Sg+Gen+Def: summarsins
    summar+N+Neu+Pl+Nom+Def: [summurini, summørini, sumrini]
    summar+N+Neu+Pl+Acc+Def: [summurini, summørini, sumrini]
    summar+N+Neu+Pl+Dat+Def: sumrunum
    summar+N+Neu+Pl+Gen+Def: sumranna
